apertium-oss.oss.dix
    <pardef n="/уын__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дӕн</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дӕ</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ис</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стӕм</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стут</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сты</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вӕййын</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вӕййыс</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вӕййы</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вӕййӕм</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вӕййут</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вӕййынц</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдтӕн</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдтӕ</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>уыдис</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыд</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдыстӕм</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдыстут</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдысты</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдзынӕн</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдзынӕ</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>уыдзӕнис</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдзӕн</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдзыстӕм</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдыстут</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдысты</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уаин</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уаис</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уанд</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уаиккам</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уаиккат</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уаиккой</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уин</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="prf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уис</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="prf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уид</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="prf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уиккам</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="prf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уиккат</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="prf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уиккой</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="prf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдаин</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдаис</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдаид</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдаиккам</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдаиккат</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыдаиккой</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уон</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уай</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уа</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уӕм</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уат</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уой</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уӕд</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ут</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уӕнт</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уӕвӕг</l>
          <r>уын<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уӕвгӕ</l>

    <e lm="уын"><i/><par n="/уын__vbser"/></e>
